Utah statutes.
31A-23b-208.   Form and contents of license.

(1)  A license issued under this chapter shall be in the form the commissioner prescribes and shall set forth:

(a)  the name and address of the licensee;

(b)  the date of license issuance; and

(c)  any other information the commissioner considers necessary.

(2)  A licensee under this chapter doing business under a name other than the licensee's legal name shall notify the commissioner before using the assumed name in this state.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

